Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2653
Notices; publication; filing.

Notice of organization, amendment, merger, consolidation, or statement of intent to dissolve must be published three successive weeks in some legal newspaper of general circulation near the registered office of the limited liability company. A notice of organization must show (1) the name of the limited liability company, (2) the address of the registered office, (3) the general nature of the business to be transacted, (4) the time of commencement and termination, if any, of the limited liability company, and (5) by what members or managers the affairs of the limited liability company are to be conducted. A brief resume of any amendment, merger, or consolidation of the limited liability company shall be published in the same manner and for the same period of time as notice of organization is required to be published. Whenever any limited liability company is voluntarily dissolved, notice of the dissolution thereof and the terms and conditions of such dissolution and the names of the persons who are to manage the company affairs and distribute its assets and their official titles, with a statement of assets and liabilities of the limited liability company, shall be published three successive weeks in some legal newspaper of general circulation within the county in which the registered office of the limited liability company is located. Proof of publication of any of the notices shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State. In the event any notice required to be given pursuant to this section is not given, but is subsequently published for the required time, and proof of the publication thereof is filed in the office of the Secretary of State, the acts of the limited liability company prior to, as well as after, such publication shall be valid.

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 52;

Laws 1997, LB 631, § 25.
January 1, 2013